Washington statutes.
RCW 19.76.120

Refilling bottles, etc.—Possession as evidence.

The using by any person other than the rightful owner thereof, without such written permission, of any such cask, barrel, keg, bottle or box, for the sale therein of ale, porter, lager beer, soda, mineral waters or other beverages, or to be furnished to customers, or the buying, selling or trafficking in any such barrel, keg, bottle or box, by any person other than the owner, without such written permission, or the fact that any junk dealer or dealers in casks, barrels, kegs, bottles or boxes, shall have in his or her possession any such cask, barrel, keg, bottle or box so marked or stamped and registered as aforesaid, without such written permission, shall and is hereby declared to be prima facie evidence that such use, buying, selling, trafficking in or possession is unlawful within the meaning of RCW 19.76.100 through 19.76.120.

[ 1897 c 38 s 3; RRS s 11548.]